Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3,236
Former military vehicle; plates; fee.

For the registration of every former military vehicle, the fee shall be fifteen dollars. Former military vehicle license plates shall display, in addition to the registration number, the designation former military vehicle.

Laws 2019, LB156, § 10.